Missouri, session 2026, SB1173.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 590.040, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 590.040,
to read as follows:
590.040. 1. The POST commission shall set the minimum
number of hours of basic training for licensure as a peace
officer no lower than six hundred, with the following
exceptions:
(1) Up to one thousand hours may be mandated for any
class of license required for commission by a state law
enforcement agency;
(2) As few as one hundred twenty hours may be mandated
for any class of license restricted to commission as a
reserve peace officer with police powers limited to the
commissioning political subdivision;
(3) Persons validly licensed on August 28, 2001, may
retain licensure without additional basic training;
(4) Persons licensed and commissioned within a county
of the third classification before July 1, 2002, may retain
licensure with one hundred twenty hours of basic training if
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1173 2
the commissioning political subdivision has adopted an order
or ordinance to that effect;
(5) Persons serving as a reserve officer on August 27,
2001, within a county of the first classification or a
county with a charter form of government and with more than
one million inhabitants on August 27, 2001, having
previously completed a minimum of one hundred sixty hours of
training, shall be granted a license necessary to function
as a reserve peace officer only within such county. For the
purposes of this subdivision, the term "reserve officer"
shall mean any person who serves in a less than full-time
law enforcement capacity, with or without pay and who,
without certification, has no power of arrest and who,
without certification, must be under the direct and
immediate accompaniment of a certified peace officer of the
same agency at all times while on duty; and
(6) The POST commission shall provide for the
recognition of basic training received at law enforcement
training centers of other states, the military, the federal
government and territories of the United States regardless
of the number of hours included in such training and shall
have authority to require supplemental training as a
condition of eligibility for licensure.
2. The director shall have the authority to limit any
exception provided in subsection 1 of this section to
persons remaining in the same commission or transferring to
a commission in a similar jurisdiction.
3. The basic training of every peace officer, except
agents of the conservation commission, shall include at
least thirty hours of training in the investigation and
management of cases involving domestic and family violence.
Such training shall include instruction, specific to

SB 1173 3
domestic and family violence cases, regarding: report
writing; physical abuse, sexual abuse, child fatalities and
child neglect; interviewing children and alleged
perpetrators; the nature, extent and causes of domestic and
family violence; the safety of victims, other family and
household members and investigating officers; legal rights
and remedies available to victims, including rights to
compensation and the enforcement of civil and criminal
remedies; services available to victims and their children;
the effects of cultural, racial and gender bias in law
enforcement; and state statutes. Said curriculum shall be
developed and presented in consultation with the department
of health and senior services, the children's division,
public and private providers of programs for victims of
domestic and family violence, persons who have demonstrated
expertise in training and education concerning domestic and
family violence, and the Missouri coalition against domestic
violence.
4. The basic training of every peace officer first
licensed on or after August 28, 2027, shall include at least
[six] nine hours of training concerning the prohibition
against racial profiling and such training shall promote
understanding and respect for racial and cultural
differences and the use of effective, noncombative methods
for carrying out law enforcement duties in a racially and
culturally diverse environment. Such training shall include
[two] three hours of racial profiling training, [two] three
hours of implicit bias training, and [two] three hours of de-
escalation training.
✓